utilities/dictionaries/fur_FUR-Friulian.dic
Francesc/l
Tolomeu/i
abìs/a
acrobatic/ae
adiacent/ae
adoradôr/ag
adriatic/ae
aeronavâl/ah
afan/ab
agarûl/an
agnul/ae
agradît/af
aiudant/ab
alchilic/ae
alpinistic/ae
amatoriâl/ah
ambassadôr/ag
amonît/ab
amorâl/ah
anaforic/ae
ancjetant/g
andament/ab
angariâ/A
angul/ac
antecedent/ae
antifassist/ag
antirivoluzionari/ae
anuâl/ah
aprossimatîf/af
aragonês/af
architetonic/ae
armelinâr/ab
arment/ae
artist/ag
assetic/ae
assiâl/ah
atenuatîf/af
ateu/ia
atomic/ae
augurâ/A
ausiliâr/am
autocontrol/ac
autograf/abe
automobilist/ag
autostop/ab
avoiâl/ah
babio/i
baldance/b
balonîr/m
banchîr/o
bancjîr/o
bandâr/m
barbonçâl/c
bastalami/h
bastonadôr/bg
bausâr/m
becjâr/m
becotâ/A
benevul/e
benzinâr/m
beolc/l
berghel/c
bibiôs/f
bifolc/l
bilietinâr/m
bilietâr/m
bimotôr/b
blanc/bl
blu/d
boreâl/c
bovin/e
boâr/m
bradasc/l
braçolâr/m
broili/d
broiâ/A
bronchiâl/h
brusc/bl
bucanîr/o
budist/g
bulo/i
bumbuie/b
bust/c
buteghîr/p
butegâr/m
calf/bf
campagnûl/n
canonîr/o
cantonîr/o
capitel/c
capuçat/e
carabinîr/o
caramelâ/A
carocîr/o
cartelin/b
cartolâr/m
cassîr/o
catasticâl/h
cavalaresc/l
censôr/g
cereâl/c
cerimonîr/o
ciert/e
cinisâr/bm
citofon/b
civilist/g
cjalcjâ/A
cjaliâr/m
cjalçât/f
cjampanâr/m
cjampâr/m
cjapitul/c
cjartolâr/m
cjavrâr/m
cjiadôr/g
clopant/e
codarûl/n
codin/b
cogul/c
colaçâr/m
colegjâl/h
colono/i
colpevulist/g
comendâ/A
comutîf/f
concuistadôr/g
coniugâl/h
conservatori/be
consum/b
contestadôr/g
continuâ/A
cordul/c
cortês/f
corîr/o
costîr/o
cramâr/m
creadôr/g
crepon/e
croste/b
crudêl/h
crustinâ/A
cudurûl/c
cuintribandîr/o
curadôr/g
cusinîr/o
cussienciôs/f
dadul/c
decorâ/A
defont/e
demagogjie/b
dermatolic/g
digjitâl/h
dignitôs/f
dindi/e
disarmâ/A
disfantâ/A
dislassât/f
dismostrâ/A
dispriesi/b
distiladôr/g
distilâ/A
distracât/f
doganîr/o
dominant/e
dumiesteâ/A
ebraic/ae
ebreu/ia
editoriâl/ah
eletorât/ab
eletricist/ag
eminent/ae
emolient/abe
empedocleu/ia
endemisim/ab
entusiastât/af
epigjeu/ia
epiteli/ac
erbarûl/an
esagon/ab
essenziâl/ah
estremistic/ae
eterosessuâl/ah
euclideu/ia
europeu/ia
evaporadôr/ab
fagotâ/A
famôs/f
fassut/b
fatôr/g
ferovîr/o
figurant/e
filibustîr/o
filiâl/hb
financîr/o
finâl/hcb
flac/l
flamant/f
foradorie/b
forestîr/o
fornâr/m
foropâ/A
fosc/l
franc/bl
fresc/l
friabil/e
frombolîr/o
frutarûl/c
furbo/i
fusilîr/o
fusât/f
gaiâ/A
galiformi/h
garze/b
gjal/c
gjalinâr/bm
gjeopolitic/e
gjestôr/g
gjigantesc/l
gjigjo/i
gjo/d
gnogno/i
gnoçâr/m
golôs/f
gravitazion/b
gri/d
grinti/h
grotesc/l
grumâl/c
ibridâ/A
idric/ae
ilustri/ah
imberlât/af
impachetâ/A
impassibil/ae
implombât/af
impressionist/ag
impreteribil/ae
incantesemâ/A
incidentâl/ah
incoerent/ae
incomparabil/ae
incrosadure/b
indecîs/af
individui/ah
individuâ/A
infermîr/ao
influent/ae
infolcjât/af
infurmiât/af
inizi/ab
insiliôs/af
insiorâ/A
institût/ab
inteletuâl/ahc
interpersonâl/ah
introdutîf/af
invernâl/ah
investidôr/ag
investiment/ab
invuaribil/ae
ipertest/ac
ipogjeu/aib
iritabil/ae
jerbarûl/n
jugoslâf/f
lacrimâl/h
lampant/e
lavoronâ/A
leadôr/g
lengonat/b
li/d
librâr/m
lic/l
ligulât/f
locâl/hc
lofio/i
lubrificant/be
ludro/i
malcreât/f
malformazion/b
manecul/c
maoist/g
marclàs/e
marsupiâl/h
marçâr/m
matinîr/p
maçarûl/c
menâ/A
meridian/be
mesozoic/e
messazîr/p
micidiâl/h
minorât/f
mocul/ce
modest/g
mol/ce
molec/bl
montagnûl/n
moro/i
moschetîr/o
mostro/i
mote/b
motâr/m
mucjo/i
mugnestri/h
mussin/e
mâl/ce
nasadôr/g
nasic/l
nibli/h
nodâr/m
nono/i
nulât/bf
numar/b
oceanic/ae
oculistic/ae
omosessuâl/ah
operari/ae
orcul/ac
origjinâ/A
ornât/af
otim/ae
otimist/ag
paiasso/i
paiesc/l
palatâl/h
pan/b
panatîr/o
pandolo/i
panetîr/o
partenopeu/i
paruchîr/o
passazîr/p
passizîr/p
past/c
pastrocj/e
patriziât/f
pegri/h
peleâr/m
persuasion/b
pescjarili/c
petenadôr/g
petrarchesc/l
petrolîr/o
peçotâr/m
pilustrâ/A
piorâr/m
piruchîr/o
pistil/c
plaçarûl/n
poie/b
pompîr/o
portinâr/m
portonîr/o
portîr/o
possent/be
postâl/h
preambul/c
predicatîf/bf
presonîr/p
prestadôr/g
pretesâr/m
primarûl/n
pro/d
prodîr/o
profonditât/b
proporzionâl/h
prudelâ/A
puartadôr/g
puartîr/o
puestâr/m
pul/c
rassegnazion/b
re/d
reagjibil/e
residenziâl/h
resinât/f
resonîr/o
restauradôr/g
reu/i
ric/l
rigjavâ/A
rimessîr/p
rinassiment/b
ringhespîl/c
romagnûl/n
romanzîr/o
rosarûl/n
rusignûl/n
rôl/c
sacramentâ/A
sagre/b
sagrât/bf
saldadôr/g
salubri/h
sardegnûl/n
sbacjo/i
sbilf/e
sburtâ/A
scaletîr/p
scarpâr/m
schi/d
scjadiment/b
scjandul/c
scombuiât/f
scuelâr/m
scultôr/g
scusâ/A
sec/bl
semafar/b
sessagjesimâl/h
sest/cg
sfi/d
sfredulîs/f
sgnaparûl/n
sgoibâ/A
similâr/b
sintomatologjic/e
siôr/g
smorfeôs/f
soflonâ/A
sostanziâl/h
sotplan/b
spagnûl/cn
spelorc/l
spi/d
sporc/l
sposadôr/g
srarît/f
stal/c
stalîr/o
stanziâ/A
stiele/b
stranîr/o
stratigrafic/e
straçarûl/n
stublau/i
studentesc/l
subalterni/h
supierp/f
supuest/c
sussistence/b
svalutâ/A
tanali/d
te/d
tercerûl/n
terenâr/m
terminâl/hc
terorist/g
terôr/b
tetul/c
tibetan/e
todesc/l
tosc/l
trabacjâ/A
tramessîr/p
travaiôs/f
tridul/c
tumorâl/h
ubidient/ae
unmont/g
ustinât/af
ustîr/ap
vacjâr/m
vasc/l
vecjo/i
vergjin/e
vertiç/b
vicinâl/h
violâ/A
viticultôr/g
vivâl/c
vualîf/f
vueresc/l
vuerezîr/p
vuerilîr/o
zi/d
zoielîr/o
zornadîr/p
çampâr/m
